Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle A. General Provisions.

§ 23-15-541.
Hours polls to be open; designation and duties of initialing poll manager and alternate initialing poll manager; curbside voting authorized for certain individuals; procedure.

At all elections, the polls shall be opened promptly at 7:00 a.m. and be kept open until the last qualified voter, who was standing in line at the polling place at 7:00 p.m., has cast his or her ballot, or 7:00 p.m., whichever is later. One (1) hour before opening the polls, and not before, the poll managers shall designate two (2) of their number, other than the poll manager who was designated as the receiving and returning poll manager, who shall be known respectively as the initialing poll manager and the alternate initialing poll manager. The alternate initialing poll manager, in the absence of the initialing poll manager, shall perform all of the duties and undertake all of the responsibilities of the initialing poll manager. When any person entitled to vote shall appear to vote, the poll managers shall locate the name of the voter in the pollbook, identify the voter by requiring the voter to submit acceptable photo identification as required by Section 23-15-563, and then allow the voter to sign his or her name in a receipt book or booklet provided for that purpose and to be used at that election only. After the voter has signed the receipt book or booklet, the initialing poll manager or, in his or her absence, the alternate initialing poll manager shall endorse his or her initials on the back of an official blank ballot, prepared in accordance with law, and at such place on the back of the ballot that the initials may be seen after the ballot has been marked and folded, and when so endorsed he or she shall deliver it to the voter, which ballot the voter shall mark in the manner provided by law, which when done the voter shall deliver the ballot to the initialing poll manager or, in his or her absence, to the alternate initialing poll manager, in the presence of the others, and the poll manager shall see that the ballot so delivered bears on the back thereof the genuine initials of the initialing poll manager, or alternate initialing poll manager, and if so, but not otherwise, the ballot shall be put into the ballot box; and when so done one (1) of the poll managers shall mark the pollbook “VOTED” across from the name of the voter and in the appropriate column. If the voter is unable to write his or her name on the receipt book, a poll manager shall note on the back of the ballot that it was receipted for by the poll manager’s assistance.

A poll manager shall be authorized to allow a physically disabled person to vote curbside during the hours in which the polls are open as described in this section.

Where the poll managers of an election, exercising their sound discretion, determine that a physically disabled person has arrived at the polls in a motor vehicle to vote, two (2) poll managers shall carry the pollbook, the receipt book, and a ballot or voting device to the motor vehicle. After determining the disabled person is a qualified elector as provided by law by locating the disabled elector’s name in the pollbook, the poll managers shall identify the disabled elector by requiring the elector to submit acceptable photo identification as required by Section 23-15-563 and then allow the elector to sign his or her name in the receipt book and cast his or her ballot in secret. To ensure the secrecy of the vote of the disabled elector, other passengers in the motor vehicle, except the disabled elector and any other disabled persons in the motor vehicle, shall exit the motor vehicle until the disabled elector has completed the casting of his or her ballot. After the disabled elector casts his or her ballot, the poll managers shall mark “VOTED” by the elector’s name and in the appropriate column in the pollbook.

If the ballot that is provided to the disabled elector is a paper ballot, the initialing poll manager shall initial the ballot as provided by law, and the disabled elector, after marking his or her ballot shall fold the ballot or place it in the ballot sleeve. The initialing poll manager or alternate initialing poll manager shall determine whether the initials on the ballot are genuine, and upon a determination that the initials are genuine, mark “VOTED” by the elector’s name and in the appropriate column in the pollbook. The initialing poll manager or alternate initialing poll manager shall without delay place the ballot in the ballot box.

If, while a voter is voting by curbside, there are less than three (3) poll managers immediately present within the polling place conducting an election, all voting at the polls shall stop until the poll managers conducting the curbside voting return to the polls so that there are at least three (3) poll managers immediately present within the polling place to conduct the election, and until a minimum of three (3) poll managers are present, the remaining poll manager or poll managers shall ensure the security of the ballot box, the voting devices, and any ballots and election materials.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a voter from requesting voter assistance as provided in Section 23-15-549.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-13 [(Codes, 1942, § 3164; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1960, ch. 448; 1857, ch. 4, art 12; 1871, §§ 370, 371; 1880, § 136; 1892, § 3648; 1906, § 4155; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6789; 1930, § 6238; 1942, § 3267; Laws, 1916, ch. 230; Laws, 1960, ch. 451; Laws, 1964, ch. 511, § 1) repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 333, 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 170; Laws, 1993, ch. 528, § 4; Laws, 2008, ch. 528, § 8; Laws, 2012, ch. 526, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 108, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-543.
Receipt booklet to be kept in polling place, except during adjournment, until enclosed in ballot box.

The receipt booklet, mentioned in Section 23-15-541, shall not be taken out of the polling place at any time until finally enclosed in the ballot box, except in case of any adjournment, when the receipt book shall be sealed in the ballot box.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-15 [Codes, 1942, § 3165; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 171; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 109, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-545.
Entries in pollbook.

At each election, at least one (1) poll manager shall be charged with writing in the pollbook the word “VOTED,” in the column having at its head the date of the election, opposite the name of each elector upon return of a marked paper ballot by the elector with the initials of the initialing poll manager or alternate initialing poll manager affixed thereon. When a DRE unit is used in the polling place, the word “VOTED” shall be marked by at least one (1) poll manager in the pollbook in the column having at its head the date of the election, opposite the name of the elector.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-149 [Codes, 1892, § 3609; 1906, § 4115; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6749; 1930, § 6239; 1942, § 3268; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 172; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 178, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-547.
Electronic capture of voters’ signatures; paper version may be generated after polls close.

Instead of placing the signatures of voters in a paper receipt book, the signatures of voters may be electronically captured in the polling place and a paper version of the signatures of voters may be generated after the close of the polling place, which shall be sealed in the ballot box.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-153 [Codes, 1892, § 3649; 1906, § 4156; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6790; 1930, § 6241; 1942, § 3270; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 173; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 110, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-549.
Assistance to voter.

Any voter who declares to the poll managers of the election that he or she requires assistance to vote by reason of blindness, disability or inability to read or write may be given assistance by a person of the voter’s choice, except that voter assistance shall not be provided by a candidate whose name is on the ballot, or by a spouse, parent, sibling or child of a candidate whose name is on the ballot, or by a poll watcher who is observing the polling place on election day, or the voter’s employer, or agent of that employer, or officer or agent of the voter’s union; however, a candidate for public office or the spouse, parent or child of a candidate may provide assistance upon request of any voter who is related within the first degree.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-157 [Codes, 1892, § 3666; 1906, § 4173; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6807; 1930, § 6243; 1942, § 3272; Laws, 1928, ch. 196; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 174; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 179, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-551.
Marking and casting ballot; who may be present in polling room.

On receiving his or her ballot, the voter shall go without undue delay into one (1) of the voting compartments and shall there prepare his or her ballot by marking with ink or indelible pencil on the appropriate margin or place a cross (X) opposite the name of the candidate of his or her choice for each office or by writing in the name of a candidate in the blank space provided, and marking a cross (X) opposite thereto, and likewise a cross (X) opposite the answer he or she desires to give in case of an election on a constitutional amendment, local option election, referenda or any other question or matter. As an alternative method, a voter may, at his or her option, prepare a ballot by marking with ink or indelible pencil in the appropriate margin or place a check, in the form of and similar to a “V”, opposite the name of the candidate of his or her choice for each office or by writing in the name of a candidate in the blank space provided and marking a check in the form of and similar to a “V”, opposite thereto, and likewise a check, in the form of and similar to a “V”, opposite the answer he or she desires to give in case of an election on a constitutional amendment, local option election, referenda or other question or matter, either of which methods of marking, whether by a cross (X) or by a check in the form of and similar to a “V”, is authorized. Before leaving the voting compartment, the voter shall fold his or her ballot without displaying its markings, but so that the words “OFFICIAL BALLOT,” followed by the designation of the voting precinct and the date of the election, shall be visible to the poll managers, then deposit his or her ballot directly into the ballot box. This shall be done without undue delay, and as soon as the voter has voted he or she shall promptly exit the polling place. A voter shall not be allowed to occupy a voting compartment already occupied by another voter, nor any compartment longer than ten (10) minutes, if other voters are not waiting, nor longer than five (5) minutes if other voters are waiting. A person shall not be allowed in the room in which the ballot boxes, compartments, tables and shelves are, except the officers of the election, and those appointed by them to assist therein, and those authorized by Section 23-15-577.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-151 [Codes, 1892, § 3664; 1906, § 4171; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6805; 1930, § 6240; 1942, § 3269; Laws, 1948, ch. 306; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 175; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 111, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-553.
Ballots not to be removed before close of polls; procedure regarding spoiled ballots when polls close.

A person shall not take or remove any ballot from the polling place before the close of the polls. If any voter spoils a ballot he or she may obtain others, one (1) at a time, not exceeding three (3) in all, upon returning each spoiled ballot. The word “SPOILED” shall be written across the face of the ballot and each ballot shall be deposited into the sealed ballot box. When the polls have closed upon the casting of the last ballot or 7:00 p.m., whichever is later, and the poll managers break the seal on the ballot box to begin closing procedures, those ballots marked as “SPOILED” shall be bundled together and placed in a separate strong envelope provided for spoiled ballots. The envelope containing all spoiled ballots shall be sealed in the ballot box once the poll managers have completed the closing procedures and returned the materials to the officials in charge of the election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-155 [Codes, 1892, § 3665; 1906, § 4172; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6806; 1930, § 6242; 1942, § 3271; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 176; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 112, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-555.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2016, ch. 430, § 22, effective from and after January 1, 2017.

§23-15-555. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-159 [Codes, 1892, § 3668; 1906, § 4175; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6809; 1930, § 6245; 1942, § 3274; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 177, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-557.
Municipality’s authority to establish precincts and polling places.

The governing authorities of any municipality within the State of Mississippi are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to divide the municipality into a sufficient number of voting precincts of such size and location as is necessary, and there shall be the same number of polling places. The authority conducting an election shall not be required, however, to establish a polling place in each of said precincts, but such election authorities, whether in a primary or in a general election, may locate and establish such polling places, without regard to precinct lines, in such manner as in the discretion of such authority will better accommodate the electorate and better facilitate the holding of the election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §21-11-21 [Codes, 1942, § 3374-69.7; Laws, 1958, ch. 516; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch 495, § 329]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 178, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-559.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 430, § 200, effective from and after July 1, 2017.

§23-15-559. [Derived from 1972 Code §21-11-23 [Codes, 1942, §§ 3374-68, 3374-11; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, §§ 68, 111; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 329]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 179, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-561.
Penalties for unlawful lottery.

It shall be unlawful during any primary or any other election for any candidate for any elective office or any representative of such candidate or any other person to publicly or privately put up or in any way offer any prize, cash award or other item of value to be raffled, drawn for, played for or contested for in order to encourage persons to vote or to refrain from voting in any election.

Any person who shall violate the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).

Any candidate who shall violate the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall, upon conviction thereof, in addition to the fine prescribed above, be punished by:

Disqualification as a candidate in the race for the elective office; or

Removal from the elective office, if the offender has been elected thereto.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 180, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-563.
Qualified elector required to provide identification before voting; kinds of identification; voting by affidavit ballot.

Each person who appears to vote in person at a polling place or the registrar’s office shall be required to identify himself or herself to a poll manager or the registrar by presenting current and valid photo identification before such person shall be allowed to vote.

The identification required by subsection (1) of this section shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

A current and valid Mississippi driver’s license;

A current and valid identification card issued by a branch, department, agency or entity of the State of Mississippi;

A current and valid United States passport;

A current and valid employee identification card containing a photograph of the elector and issued by any branch, department, agency or entity of the United States government, the State of Mississippi, or any county, municipality, board, authority or other entity of this state;

A current and valid Mississippi license to carry a pistol or revolver;

A valid tribal identification card containing a photograph of the elector;

A current and valid United States military identification card;

A current and valid student identification card, containing a photograph of the elector, issued by any accredited college, university or community or junior college in the State of Mississippi; and

An official Mississippi voter identification card containing a photograph of the elector.

A person who appears to vote in person at a polling place and does not have identification as required by this section may vote by affidavit ballot. The affidavit ballot shall then be counted if the person shall present acceptable photo identification to the registrar within five (5) days.

An elector who has a religious objection to being photographed may vote by affidavit ballot, and the elector, within five (5) days after the election, shall execute an affidavit in the registrar’s office affirming that the exemption applies.

The intentional failure of an election official to require a voter to present identification as required by this section shall be considered corrupt conduct under Section 97-13-19 and shall be reported to the Secretary of State and the Attorney General.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 113, eff from and after July 1, 2017; brought forward without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 344, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).